Utah statutes.
58-9-304.   Continuing education.
(1)  As a condition precedent for license renewal, each funeral service
director shall, during each two-year licensure cycle or other cycle defined by
rule, complete 20 hours of qualified continuing professional education in
accordance with standards defined by rule.
(2)  If a renewal cycle is extended or shortened under Section 58-9-303, the
continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section
shall be increased or decreased proportionally.
